Hawaii statutes.
[§27G-4] Duties of the
committee. The committee shall provide oversight of the portal manager,
including:

(1) Review of the annual strategic plan and periodic
reports on potential new applications and services submitted by the portal
manager;

(2) Review and approval of all charges to portal
users;

(3) Review and approval of service level agreements
negotiated by government agencies with the portal manager;

(4) Review of the annual financial reports and audit
of the portal manager;

(5) Review of annual customer satisfaction surveys
conducted by the portal manager; and

(6) Review of performance measures of the portal
submitted as part of the service management plan for portal-wide indicators and
application specific indicators. [L 2007, c 172, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next